Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-5829.03
Certificate
of need; activities requiring.

Except as provided in section
71-5830.01, no person, including persons acting for or on behalf of a health
care facility, shall engage in any of the following activities without having
first applied for and received the necessary certificate of need:

(1) The initial establishment of long-term care beds or rehabilitation
beds except as permitted under subdivisions (4) and (5) of this section;

(2) An increase in the long-term care beds of a health care facility
by more than ten long-term care beds or more than ten percent of the total
long-term care bed capacity of such facility, whichever is less, over a two-year
period;

(3) An increase in the rehabilitation beds of a health care facility
by more than ten rehabilitation beds or more than ten percent of the total
rehabilitation bed capacity of such facility, whichever is less, over a two-year
period;

(4) Any initial establishment of long-term care beds through conversion
by a hospital of any type of hospital beds to long-term care beds if the total
beds converted by the hospital are more than ten beds or more than ten percent
of the total bed capacity of such hospital, whichever is less, over a two-year
period;

(5) Any initial establishment of rehabilitation beds through conversion
by a hospital of any type of hospital beds to rehabilitation beds if the total
beds converted by the hospital are more than ten beds or more than ten percent
of the total bed capacity of such hospital, whichever is less, over a two-year
period; or

(6) Any relocation of rehabilitation beds in Nebraska from one health
care facility to another health care facility, except that no certificate of need is required for relocation
or transfer of rehabilitation beds from a health care facility to another
health care facility owned and operated by the same entity.

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 22;

Laws 2008, LB765, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 84;

Laws 2013, LB487, § 1.